Connecticut, session 2026, HB05214.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective July 1, 2026) Notwithstanding the provisions of
sections 10-215, 10-215a and 10-266w of the general statutes, for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, each eligible school district shall (1)
provide (A) school breakfasts to all students at no charge to such
students, and (B) school lunches to all students eligible for free or
reduced priced lunch at no charge to such students, and (2) be eligible
to receive a grant from the Department of Education for such free school
breakfasts and school lunches. As used in this section, "eligible school
district" means a local or regional board of education, state or local
charter school or an interdistrict magnet school operator that (A) is
participating in the federal School Breakfast Program or the National
Lunch Program, as the case may be, and (B) is not implementing the
Community Eligibility Provision; and "Community Eligibility
Provision" means the federal meal reimbursement program
administered by the United States Department of Agriculture, as set
forth in 7 CFR 245.9, as amended from time to time.
LCO 1283 1 of 2

Raised Bill No. 5214
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 New section
ED Joint Favorable C/R APP
LCO 1283 2 of 2